District of Columbia statutes.
3-1206.34

Council hearing.

Three years from March 16, 2005, the Council committee having jurisdiction over the Department of Health shall hold a public hearing on the appropriateness of the requirements for anesthesiologist assistants imposed by the Act [D.C. Law 15-237].

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 634
as added Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-237, § 2(h), 51 DCR 10593
The “Act”, referred to in text, refers to Law 15-237.